Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-101.06
Escrow accounts; not required.

It is not the intent of sections 45-101.05 to 45-101.07 to require that escrow accounts be required or established.

Laws 1976, LB 502, § 2.